Arkansas, session 2025, SB616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 10, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 26 — Arkansas Long-Term Care Facility Resident Monitoring and
Communications Act

20-10-2601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Long-
Term Care Facility Resident Monitoring and Communications Act".

*JMB612*
04/03/2025 8:13:13 AM JMB612

SB616
20-10-2602. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The safety and welfare of long-term care facility residents
need to be protected;
(2) Communication with loved ones is beneficial to a long-term
care facility resident’s safety, welfare, and overall quality of life;
(3) Electronic monitoring and communication of long-term care
facility residents is not prohibited by state law;
(4) State law currently provides no guidance to long-term care
facilities or the Department of Human Services regarding electronic
monitoring and communication of long-term care facility residents;
(5) The privacy of long-term care facility residents, including
any roommates and others who may enter their residence, is of the highest
priority;
(6) Residents and their families or legal representatives should
be allowed to use both video and audio monitoring systems, and other emerging
technologies, to facilitate safe and ethical observation of residents within
long-term care settings; and
(7) A comprehensive legislative and regulatory framework is
necessary to ensure that the rights of residents are respected while
balancing provider responsibilities and privacy considerations.

20-10-2603. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Authorized electronic monitoring and communication" means
the placement of one (1) or more electronic monitoring devices in the room of
a long-term care facility resident and making recordings or conducting audio
or video communication with such devices after notifying the long-term care
facility of the resident’s or the resident’s guardian's or legal
representative's intent to conduct electronic monitoring and communication;
(2) "Electronic monitoring device" means a camera, microphone,
or other instrument used to broadcast, record, or communicate audio or visual
activity occurring in a room, including video cameras, audio devices, or any
emerging technology designed to enable communication or monitoring, but not
to intercept wire or unauthorized electronic communications;
(3) “Long-term care facility” means:
04/03/2025 8:13:13 AM JMB612

SB616
(A) A nursing home;
(B) A residential care facility;
(C) A post-acute head injury retraining and residential
facility;
(D) An intermediate care facility for individuals with
developmental disabilities;
(E) An assisted living facility; or
(F) A facility that provides long-term medical or personal
care;
(4) “Resident” means a person who resides in a long-term care
facility;
(5) "Resident’s room" means a room in a long-term care facility
that is used as a resident’s private living quarters; and
(6) “Resident’s roommate” means a person who resides in the same
room with another resident.

20-10-2604. Authorized electronic monitoring and communications.
(a)(1) The Department of Human Services may adopt rules concerning
authorized electronic monitoring and communication in a resident’s room.
(2) Rules promulgated under this subsection shall include
without limitation:
(A) That a resident or resident’s guardian or legal
representative may conduct authorized electronic monitoring and communication
in the resident’s room subject to this subchapter;
(B) That a long-term care facility shall not discharge,
refuse to admit, or otherwise retaliate against a resident or the resident’s
representative for conducting or consenting to authorized electronic
monitoring and communication;
(C) That a resident or the resident’s guardian or legal
representative who wishes to conduct authorized monitoring shall notify the
long-term care facility using a form prescribed by the department;
(D) That if a resident resides in a shared room,
monitoring may not be permitted without the written consent of the resident's
roommate or the resident's roommate’s legal guardian or representative;
(E) How consent may be given, withheld, or withdrawn;
(F) Procedures for when a resident lacks capacity to
04/03/2025 8:13:13 AM JMB612

SB616
consent;
(G) That a resident or the resident's legal guardian or
representative may be required to release the long-term care facility from
civil liability related to authorized monitoring and communication, subject
to applicable laws; and
(H) That long-term care facilities may require electronic
monitoring devices to be placed in plain view.
(b) All monitoring devices shall comply with the National Fire
Protection Association 101 Life Safety Code or standards determined by the
department to be substantially equivalent.
(c) Unless otherwise required by state or federal law, a court or
agency shall not admit or consider recordings made under this section as
evidence or take action based on the recordings.

20-10-2605. Comprehensive framework.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall develop a proposed
comprehensive framework to ensure and expand the rights of residents and
families to conduct authorized electronic monitoring and communication in
long-term care facilities.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall delegate
the development of the framework to the appropriate divisions within the
Department of Human Services.
(c) In developing the framework, the Department of Human Services
shall:
(1) Collaborate with other state agencies, including the
Department of Health;
(2) Consider laws, rules, and regulations in other states that
protect the right to conduct authorized electronic monitoring and
communication and prohibit interference by long-term care facility operators;
(3) Ensure the framework allows for both video and audio
devices, as well as the incorporation of emerging technologies for safe,
respectful monitoring and communication;
(4) Address issues including without limitation privacy,
consent, liability, safety, implementation, and oversight; and
(5) Recommend specific legislation and rules that safeguard
resident rights while ensuring compliance by facilities.
04/03/2025 8:13:13 AM JMB612

SB616

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Reporting.
On or before July 1, 2026, the Department of Human Services shall
present its proposed comprehensive framework to:
(1) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and
(2) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.





























04/03/2025 8:13:13 AM JMB612